Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.190.110 and 2013 c 23 s 97 are each amended to read as follows:((All records and files of long-term care ombuds relating to any complaint or investigation made pursuant to carrying out their duties and the identities of complainants, witnesses, patients, or residents shall remain confidential unless disclosure is authorized by the patient or resident or his or her guardian or legal representative. No disclosures may be made outside the office without the consent of any named witnesses, resident, patient, client, or complainant unless the disclosure is made without the identity of any of these individuals being disclosed))The office of the state long-term care ombuds shall establish procedures for disclosure pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 3058g(d). Such procedures shall provide for exercising discretion in favor of disclosure to the maximum extent consistent with federal law and the policies of chapter 42.56 RCW.Sec. 2. RCW 10.27.160 and 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:The grand jury may prepare its conclusions, recommendations and suggestions in the form of a grand jury report. Such report shall be released to the public only upon a determination by a majority of the judges of the superior court of the county court that (1) the findings in the report deal with matters of broad public policy affecting the public interest ((and do not identify or criticize any individual)); (2) the release of the report would be consistent with the public interest and further the ends of justice; and (3) release of the report would not prejudice any pending criminal investigation or trial.Sec. 3. RCW 27.53.070 and 2011 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is the declared intention of the legislature that field investigations on privately owned lands should be conducted by professional archaeologists in accordance with both the provisions and spirit of this chapter. Persons having knowledge of the location of archaeological sites or resources are encouraged to communicate such information to the department. Such information shall ((not constitute a public record which requires))be exempt from disclosure pursuant to the exception authorized in ((chapter 42.56 RCW to avoid site depredation))RCW 42.56.300.(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to allow trespassing on private property.Sec. 4. RCW 46.52.065 and 1977 ex.s. c 50 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Every coroner or other official performing like functions shall submit to the state toxicologist a blood sample taken from all drivers and all pedestrians who are killed in any traffic accident where the death occurred within four hours after the accident. Blood samples shall be taken and submitted in the manner prescribed by the state toxicologist. The state toxicologist shall analyze these blood samples to determine the concentration of alcohol and, where feasible, the presence of drugs or other toxic substances. The reports and records of the state toxicologist relating to analyses made pursuant to this section shall be ((confidential: PROVIDED, That the results of these analyses shall be)) reported to the state patrol and made available to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agency having jurisdiction((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the)). The results of these analyses may be admitted in evidence in any civil or criminal action where relevant and shall be made available to the parties to any such litigation ((on application to the court)).Sec. 5. RCW 46.52.080 and 1979 c 158 s 162 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All required accident reports and supplemental reports and copies thereof shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the county prosecuting attorney and chief of police or county sheriff, as the case may be, and the director of licensing and the chief of the Washington state patrol, and other officer or commission as authorized by law, except that ((any)):(a) Any such officer shall disclose the names and addresses of persons reported as involved in an accident or as witnesses thereto, the vehicle license plate numbers and descriptions of vehicles involved, and the date, time and location of an accident, to any person who may have a proper interest therein, including the driver or drivers involved, or the legal guardian thereof, the parent of a minor driver, any person injured therein, the owner of vehicles or property damaged thereby, or any authorized representative of such an interested party, or the attorney or insurer thereof; and(b) Accident reports and supplemental reports may be disclosed pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW upon redaction of all information identifying the persons involved in the accidents, including names, addresses, phone numbers, email addresses, license plate numbers, driver's license numbers, vehicle identification numbers, social security numbers, and photos of such persons.(2) No ((such)) accident report described under subsection (1) of this section or copy thereof shall be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident, except that any officer above named for receiving accident reports shall furnish, upon demand of any person who has, or who claims to have, made such a report, or, upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to the chief of the Washington state patrol solely to prove a compliance or a failure to comply with the requirement that such a report be made in the manner required by law: PROVIDED, That the reports may be used as evidence when necessary to prosecute charges filed in connection with a violation of RCW 46.52.088.Sec. 6. RCW 72.05.130 and 2020 c 274 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall establish, maintain, operate and administer a comprehensive program for the custody, care, education, treatment, instruction, guidance, control, and rehabilitation of all persons who may be committed or admitted to institutions, schools, or other facilities, placed under the control of each, except for the programs of education provided pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.050 which shall be established, operated, and administered by the school district conducting the program, and in order to accomplish these purposes, the powers and duties of the secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families for the institutions placed under the respective department shall include the following:(1) The assembling, analyzing, tabulating, and reproduction in report form, of statistics and other data with respect to children with behavior problems in the state of Washington, including, but not limited to, the extent, kind, and causes of such behavior problems in the different areas and population centers of the state. ((Such reports shall not be open to public inspection, but shall be open to the inspection of the governor and to the superior court judges of the state of Washington.))(2) The establishment and supervision of diagnostic facilities and services in connection with the custody, care, and treatment of persons with disabilities, and behavior problem children who may be committed or admitted to any of the institutions, schools, or facilities controlled and operated by the department, or who may be referred for such diagnosis and treatment by any superior court of this state. Such diagnostic services may be established in connection with, or apart from, any other state institution under the supervision and direction of the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families. Such diagnostic services shall be available to the superior courts of the state for persons referred for such services by them prior to commitment, or admission to, any school, institution, or other facility. Such diagnostic services shall also be available to other departments of the state. When the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families determines it necessary, the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may create waiting lists and set priorities for use of diagnostic services for juvenile offenders on the basis of those most severely in need.(3) The supervision of all persons committed or admitted to any institution, school, or other facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, and the transfer of such persons from any such institution, school, or facility to any other such school, institution, or facility: PROVIDED, That where a person has been committed to a minimum security institution, school, or facility by any of the superior courts of this state, a transfer to a close security institution shall be made only with the consent and approval of such court.(4) The supervision of parole, discharge, or other release, and the post-institutional placement of all persons committed to Green Hill school, or such as may be assigned, paroled, or transferred therefrom to other facilities operated by the department. Green Hill school is hereby designated as a "close security" institution to which shall be given the custody of children with the most serious behavior problems.Sec. 7. RCW 21.20.480 and 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:It is unlawful for the director or any of the director's officers or employees to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with or obtained by the director and which is not made public. ((The director or any of the director's officers or employees shall not disclose any such information or the fact that any investigation is being made except among themselves or when necessary or appropriate in a proceeding or investigation under this chapter.)) No provision of this chapter either creates or derogates from any privilege which exists at common law or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a subpoena directed to the director or any of the director's officers or employees.Sec. 8. RCW 43.41.100 and 2009 c 549 s 5119 are each amended to read as follows:The director of financial management shall:(1) Supervise and administer the activities of the office of financial management.(2) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by law with respect to the administration of the state budget and accounting system.(3) Advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters affecting program management and planning.(4) Make efficiency surveys of all state departments and institutions, and the administrative and business methods pursued therein, examine into the physical needs and industrial activities thereof, and make ((confidential)) reports to the governor, recommending necessary betterments, repairs, and the installation of improved and more economical administrative methods, and advising such action as will result in a greater measure of self-support and remedies for inefficient functioning.The director may enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter; he or she may act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any multi-governmental agency program relative to the purposes of this chapter; and he or she may accept gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 18.46.090 (Information confidential) and 2000 c 93 s 36 & 1951 c 168 s 10;(2) RCW 24.06.480 (Confidential nature of information disclosed by interrogatories) and 1982 c 35 s 158 & 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 96; and(3) RCW 26.12.080 (Protection of privacy of parties) and 1989 c 375 s 22 & 1949 c 50 s 8.--- END ---